West Virginia, session 2026, SB60.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. NONINTOXICATING BEER. §11-16-17. Container labeling. (a) It shall be is unlawful for any brewer, brewpub, manufacturer, distributor or retailer to have affixed upon any beer, ale or other malt beverage or malt cooler container, sold or for sale in this state, a label bearing any design, picture or wording, indicating that the contents of the container are brewed or manufactured for one particular distributor or retailer or group of retailers, or use any trademark other than that of a licensed brewer or manufacturer.(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, any brewer, brewpub, manufacturer, or resident brewer that has not appointed a distributor for an existing nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer brand within a franchise territory may, within that territory, make available for purchase a special, private label for nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer brand, which label may not contain any statement or display that may encourage intemperance or advertising presentations designed to appeal to persons below the legal drinking age. A private label for a nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer brand made available for purchase under this subsection shall:(1) Be made available exclusively for a limited purchase by one licensee or individual that purchases the entire production of the private label;(2) Be purchased at the regular, posted price for the subject nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer brand, with no reduced price or discount to be offered to the purchasing licensee or individual; and(3) May not be sold in a quantity exceeding 25 cases of 24 bottles, cans, or other sealed containers.